Illinois, session 104th, HB2363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1056 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1056 new)8    Sec. 605-1056. Capacity building grants. Subject to 9appropriation, the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, 11is authorized to create and award capacity building grants to 12municipalities whose equalized assessed value, total State 13sales tax disbursements, or both combined, subject to 14inflation, decreased at least 30% over the 10 years preceding 15the issuance of the grant. The Department shall adopt rules to 16implement and administer the requirements of this Section. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.